Nebraska, session 109, LB666.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB666 LB666
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 86-1505, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-1505 After a granting agency makes final payment of public funds
under a broadband deployment program to a competitive provider in a
deployment project area that is part of a local exchange area served by
an incumbent carrier, upon request by the incumbent carrier or
competitive provider the commission expeditiously shall:
(1) Upon finding that the granting agency has determined the
competitive provider is in compliance with all requirements of the
broadband deployment program, relieve the incumbent carrier of eligible
telecommunications carrier obligations and carrier of last resort
obligations in the deployment project area;
(2) Consistent with rules of procedure adopted and promulgated by
the commission, make determinations related to allocations and
distributions of support from the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal
Service Fund for the deployment project area; and
(3) In coordination with the Federal Communications Commission, and
in consultation with the incumbent carrier and the competitive provider,
determine whether eligible telecommunications carrier and carrier of last
resort obligations corresponding with support from the Nebraska
Telecommunications Universal Service Fund in the deployment project area
should be transferred to the competitive provider.
Sec. 2. Original section 86-1505, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-